California, session 20252026, AB1742.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 415.70 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:415.70. (a) If a person attempting service of a summons and complaint on a tenant or occupant within a commercial building wherein access to tenant spaces is controlled by security personnel, concierge staff, or similar agents, is refused entry to the tenant or occupant’s designated space, or is otherwise prevented from making a direct attempt at personal service, such person shall be authorized to leave a copy of the summons and complaint for the tenant or occupant to be served at the commercial building’s central point of access. Service of the summons and complaint in this manner by leaving the documents with security personnel, concierge staff, or similar agents constitutes substituted service on the tenant or occupant.(b) Service made pursuant to this section is deemed complete on the date and time of service, if the person serving the summons and complaint thereafter deposits by first-class mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the summons and complaint addressed to the person controlling access at the address where the copy of the summons and complaint were served, in the manner required by subdivision (b) of Section 415.20.(c) Proof of service under this section shall include a declaration by the person serving the summons and complaint that sets forth all of the following:(1) The date, time, and place of service.(2) The identity or description of the person controlling access with whom the documents were deposited, and facts showing that the person appeared to be at least 18 years of age and in charge of the access point.(3) Any prior attempts at personal service demonstrating reasonable diligence, if required.(4) Any refusal by a person controlling access to allow direct access or to accept documents, and the stated basis, if any, for such refusal.(5) The date, time, and method by which the follow-up copy was transmitted pursuant to subdivision (b).(d) For purposes of this section, “commercial building” means a standalone or multi-tenant structure or complex used for business, professional, or commercial purposes. This includes, but is not limited to, office towers, professional complexes, and mixed-use buildings with commercial occupancy, where access to tenant spaces is controlled by security personnel, concierge staff, or similar agents stationed at a central point such as a lobby, reception desk, or elevator bank.(e) For purposes of this section, “person attempting service” means any individual authorized by law to serve a summons, subpoena, notice, or other legal paper or document. This includes, but is not limited to, a process server as defined in subdivision (f), a sheriff, marshal, constable, any other person lawfully appointed by the court, an attorney, or any person 18 years of age or older not a party to the action.(f) For purposes of this section, “process server” means an individual registered under Section 22351 of the Business and Professions Code who presents a county-issued process server identification card as set forth in Section 22351 of the Business and Professions Code and states that they are present to serve process, or a sheriff, marshal, or other person authorized by law to serve process, summons, or subpoenas.(g) For purposes of this section, a guard, security personnel, concierge staff, or similar agent who receives documents under subdivision (b) shall be deemed a “person apparently in charge” of the tenant’s office or place of business pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 415.20.(h) This section does not apply to a single-tenant building in which direct access to the tenant’s premises is not restricted by security personnel, concierge staff, or similar agents, or when an alternative method of service authorized by this code, including service by mail under Section 415.30, is chosen by the serving party.(i) This section does not apply to individuals, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code.